Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Authority to Own and Operate System

7-35-401. Authority granted — Part definitions.

Every incorporated city and town in this state is authorized and empowered to own, acquire, construct, extend, equip, operate and maintain within or without the corporate limits of such city or town a waterworks system or a sewerage system, to provide water or sewerage service and to charge for such service.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Sewerage system” means all or any part of the following:

The collecting system;

Intercepting and outflow sewers;

Pumping stations;

Treatment, purification and disposal plants; and

The installation of green infrastructure practices within areas containing collecting systems designed to convey both sanitary sewage and storm water. Green infrastructure practices include, but are not limited to: trees, tree boxes, vegetated roofs, infiltration strips, rain gardens, cisterns, dry wells, permeable pavement, soil amendments, pocket wetlands, and vegetated swales. Green infrastructure practices may be implemented on both public and private property at the discretion of the incorporated city or town;

“Waterworks system” means all or any part of the following:

Source of supply;

Pumping facilities;

Purification works;

Storage facilities;

Distribution system; and

All necessary parts and appurtenances for proper operation; and

“Works” means the waterworks or sewerage system.

The power to own, acquire, construct, extend, equip, operate and maintain water or sewerage service shall not include the power to bid on or construct any project for a private purpose. As used in this subsection (c):

“Municipal corporation” means any incorporated city or town in this state and any utility district created pursuant to chapter 82 of this title;

“Project for a private purpose” includes, but is not limited to:

Any commercial project, commercial subdivision, private residence or residential subdivision that is owned by a nonpublic entity;

The construction of individual water or sewerage lines beyond a meter that measures service or consumption, or onto private property, unless such water or sewerage line is owned by, or a utility easement has been obtained by, the municipal corporation; and

Any other projects that are not part of the normal operation of a municipal corporation in providing water or sewerage services and which projects are otherwise constructed by private contractors who are subject to the sales tax, the business tax and other tax laws and licensure laws of this state;

“Project for a private purpose” does not include the renewal or replacement of any existing water or sewerage lines that are owned by the municipal corporation; and

“Project for a private purpose” does not include the renewal or replacement of individual water or sewage lines behind a meter or onto private property when such rehabilitative maintenance or construction is deemed necessary by the municipal corporation because excessive infiltration and inflow from groundwater or rainwater is resulting in sanitary sewer overflows or other serious health or system capacity issues. Municipal corporations are authorized, but not required, to maintain or construct individual lines for this purpose if the property owner consents and agrees to hold the municipal corporation harmless for the work.

This subsection (c) shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1408; Acts 1988, ch. 738, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 123, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 792, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (1)(E) in the definition of “sewerage system” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 792, § 2. April 12, 2016.

Cross-References. Extension of service beyond corporate limits, §7-51-401.

Loans to municipalities from state for waterworks construction, title 68, ch. 221, part 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city utility system to repair privately owned lines, OAG 06-030 (2/13/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30.

Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality. OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196.

Provisions of T.C.A. §7-35-401(c) eliminate the need for a utility easement when the objective is to reduce sanitary sewer overflows on private property. OAG 08-185 (12/12/08), 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 230.

Provisions of T.C.A. §7-35-401(c)(2) do not apply to the Hamilton County water and wastewater treatment authority, OAG 08-185 (12/12/08), 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 230.

The fact that a city imposes a water and sewage rate on customers outside its corporate limits that is twice the rate charged to customers within its corporate limits does not by itself establish that the higher rate is invalid. The rate is presumptively valid, and a party seeking to challenge it bears the heavy burden of proving that the rate is not just and equitable. OAG 14-46, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 49 (4/14/14).

7-35-402. Purchase and combining of works.

One (1) or more waterworks or sewerage systems, owned by one (1) or more persons or corporations, may be acquired under authority of this part as a single enterprise, and the governing body of a city or town shall be and is empowered to enter into agreement with the owners as to the value of the waterworks or sewerage systems, and to purchase the waterworks or sewerage systems at an agreed price to be fixed by resolution passed by the governing body of the city or town upon three (3) separate readings on three (3) separate days. The city or town shall be understood to have all authority necessary to combine new works acquired under this part by purchase, construction or otherwise with any similar existing works owned by the city or town, all to be a part of the same single enterprise under the same supervision and control.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1409.

7-35-403. Condemnation or purchase of necessary property.

Any city or town proceeding under this part is authorized and empowered to condemn property for any and all purposes necessary for the proper completion of the works and the proper operation of the works. Where condemnation proceedings are employed, they shall be in accordance with the established laws of the state in title 29, chapter 16. The cities and towns are authorized to acquire by purchase any existing works, lands, rights, easements, franchises and any other property, real or personal, necessary to the proper completion and operation of the works. Title to property so condemned or purchased shall be taken in the name of the city or town. Where title to any property necessary to the completion or operation of the works is defective, authority is conferred to cure the defects by proper court proceedings. Where a condemnation proceeding becomes necessary, right of possession may issue immediately upon filing proceedings for condemnation, upon the posting of a bond for the value of the property with the clerk of the court.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1410.

Cross-References. Condemnation for municipal sewers and conduits, title 29, ch. 17, part 2.

Condemnation for municipal sewers and waterworks, §7-35-101.

7-35-404. Elements included in cost of works.

The costs of the works shall be deemed to include all the costs of acquisition or construction of the works, the costs of all property, rights, easements, and franchises deemed necessary or convenient for the works, and for the improvements determined upon as provided in §7-35-420; interest upon bonds prior to and during construction or acquisition and for six (6) months after the completion of construction or acquisition of the improvements; engineering and legal expenses; expense for estimates of cost and of revenues; expense for plans, specifications and surveys; other expenses incident or necessary to determining the feasibility or practicability of the enterprise; administrative expense; and such other expenses as may be necessary to the financing authorized in this part and the construction or acquisition of the works and the placing of the works in operation and the performance of the things required in this part or permitted in connection with any of the provisions of this part.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1411.

7-35-405. Payment of preliminary expense.

All necessary expenses actually incurred by the governing body of any city or town in the making of surveys, estimates of costs and revenues, employment of engineers or other employees, the giving of notices, taking of options and all other expenses of whatever nature, necessary to be paid prior to the issuance and delivery of the revenue bonds pursuant to this part, may be met and paid in the following manner:

The governing body may from time to time certify such items of expenses to the proper fiscal agent of the city or town, directing the fiscal agent to pay the several amounts of the expenses; and

The expenses shall be paid out of the general fund of such city or town not otherwise appropriated, or from any other available fund without a special appropriation being made for the payments by the governing body of the city or town.

All such payments from the general or other funds shall be considered as temporary loans and shall be repaid immediately upon sale and delivery of the bonds, and claim for such repayment shall have priority over all other claims against the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1412.

7-35-406. Board of commissioners — Authorized — Governing body may perform duties of board — Jurisdiction over gas systems.

Every incorporated city and town in this state acquiring a waterworks or sewerage system under this part shall be required and is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint a board of waterworks and/or sewerage commissioners to have supervision and control of construction and operation of such works. “Board,” as used in this part, means a board of waterworks and/or sewerage commissioners as required and authorized in this section, constituted and appointed as provided in §§ 7-35-407 — 7-35-409. The governing body of any incorporated city or town may, by proper ordinance, elect to perform the duties required of the boards under this part, in which event the governing body shall have all the powers, duties and responsibilities imposed upon the board, and all references to the board shall refer to such governing body acting in the capacity of such board.

Municipalities now or hereafter owning or operating a gas system shall have the power and are hereby authorized to transfer to and confer upon the board of waterworks and sewerage commissioners the jurisdiction over such gas system.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.2; Acts 1963, ch. 232, § 1; 1968, ch. 465, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1413.

Cross-References. Compensation when gas system jurisdiction transferred to board, §7-35-409.

7-35-407. Board of commissioners — Provided — Jurisdiction — Creation — First board.

Any city or town acquiring a waterworks or sewerage system under this part shall provide a board of waterworks or sewerage commissioners, to consist of five (5) members, who shall have custody, administration, operation, maintenance and control of such works. The board of commissioners shall be created in the following manner: at the time the governing body of the city or town passes the ordinance authorizing the acquisition of a waterworks or sewerage system, the governing body shall appoint five (5) members from among the property holders, who are and have been residents of the city or town for not less than one (1) year next preceding the date of appointment. The governing body of the municipality may, in its discretion, appoint as one (1) of the five (5) members a member from such governing board of the municipality, but in that event, the term of the member shall never extend beyond the member's term of office in the governing body of the municipality.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.19; Acts 1968, ch. 465, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1414.

7-35-408. Board of commissioners — Appointment — Terms.

Commissioners shall be appointed by majority vote of the governing body of the city or town, the original appointees to serve from the date of appointment for one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively, from the next succeeding July 1, unless a member of the governing body of the city is appointed to serve on the board, and in that event, the original appointees to serve from the date of appointment for one (1), two (2), three (3), and four (4) years, respectively, from the next succeeding July 1. Each successor to a retired member of the board shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years in the same manner, at the next regular meeting of the governing body of the city in June next preceding the expiration of the term of office of the retiring member. Appointments to complete unexpired terms of office, vacant for any cause, shall be made in the same manner as the original appointments.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.19; Acts 1968, ch. 465, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1415.

7-35-409. Board of commissioners — Bond — Oath — Officers of board — Meetings — Compensation.

Each member shall give such bond, if any, as may be required by ordinance, and shall qualify by taking the same oath of office as required for governing officials of the city or town. Within ten (10) days after appointment and qualification of members, the board shall hold a meeting to elect a chair, and designate a secretary and treasurer, or a secretary-treasurer, who need not be a member or members of the board, and fix the amount of the surety bond that shall be required of such treasurer and shall fix such person's compensation. The board shall hold public meetings at least once per month, at such regular time and place as the board may determine. Changes in the time and place of meeting shall be made known to the public as far in advance as practicable. Except as otherwise expressly provided, the board shall establish its own rules of procedure.

All members of the board shall serve without compensation, but they shall be allowed necessary traveling and other expenses while engaged in the business of the board, including an allowance not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per month for attendance at meetings. Such expenses, as well as the salaries of the secretary and treasurer, or secretary-treasurer, shall constitute a cost of operation and maintenance.

All members of the board shall receive an additional allowance, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), per month for attendance at meetings when the municipalities have thereby authorized to transfer to and confer upon the board of waterworks or sewerage commissioners the jurisdiction over the gas system. Such additional allowances shall constitute a cost of operation and maintenance of the utility systems.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.19; Acts 1979, ch. 229, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1416.

Cross-References. Transfer of gas system jurisdiction to board, §7-35-406.

7-35-410. Removal of commissioners.

Any member of the board may be removed from office for cause, but only after preferment of formal charges and trial before a court of proper jurisdiction. Charges may be preferred by resolution of the governing body of the city or town by any member of the board, or by a petition signed by two percent (2%) or more, but no fewer than twenty-five (25) in number, of the owners of property served by the works.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1417.

7-35-411. Use of existing boards.

The provisions of this part requiring any city or town acquiring a waterworks or sewerage system to create a board of waterworks or sewerage commissioners, defining their duties, qualifications, method of appointment or election, term of office, compensation, time of meetings, organization, removal from office and powers, shall not apply to any city or town having in existence on April 11, 1933, a department, board or commission, invested with similar duties and powers, and, in its discretion, any such city or town may substitute for the board of waterworks or sewerage commissioners provided for in this part such department, board or commission as is in existence on April 11, 1933, which shall be clothed with all powers and duties given to the board of waterworks or sewerage commissioners by this part, but shall be required to qualify by giving bond or taking oath as provided in this part.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.24; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1418.

7-35-412. Powers and duties of board.

The board of waterworks or sewerage commissioners, constituted and appointed as provided in this part and referred to in this part as the “board”, has the power to take all steps and proceedings and to make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this part, subject only to limitations on matters requiring approval by the governing body of the city or town in question.

From and after its first meeting, the board shall act in an advisory capacity to the governing body of the city or town in all matters pertaining to the financing of the enterprise and the acquisition of any or all parts of the proposed works or extensions to the works by purchase, condemnation or construction, and it is the board's duty to collect and furnish all necessary data and information, and to recommend such appropriate action by the governing body as may appear to the board to be necessary from time to time.

Subject to and after approval by the governing body of the city or town, the board shall have the power, and it shall be the board's duty, to proceed with all matters pertaining to construction, extensions, improvements and repairs necessary to proper completion of the works. After completion and acceptance of the works by the board, and approval of such acceptance by the governing body of the city or town, the board shall have the power, and it shall be its duty, to proceed with all matters and perform everything necessary to the proper operation of the works and collection of charges for service rendered, subject only to the limitation of funds available for operation and maintenance. To this end, the board may employ such employees as in its judgment may be necessary and may fix their compensation, all of whom shall do such work as the board shall direct. The board shall have power to employ engineers and attorneys whenever in its judgment such services are necessary.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1419.

7-35-413. Records and reports.

The board shall keep a complete and accurate record of all meetings and actions taken, receipts and disbursements, and shall make reports of the records to the governing body of the city or town, at stated intervals, not to exceed one (1) year. The reports shall be in writing, and in open meeting of the governing body of the city or town, and a copy filed with the city or town clerk.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1420.

7-35-414. Rates and charges — Minimum base rate charge considered a local tax.

The governing body of any city or town acquiring and operating a waterworks or sewerage system under this part has the power, and it is the governing body's duty, by ordinance, to establish and maintain just and equitable rates and charges for the use of and the service rendered by the waterworks or sewerage system, to be paid by the beneficiary of the service. The rates and charges shall be adjusted so as to provide funds sufficient to pay all reasonable expenses of operation, repair, and maintenance, provide for a sinking fund for payment of principal and interest of bonds when due, and maintain an adequate depreciation account, and the rates and charges may be readjusted as necessary from time to time by amendment to the ordinance establishing the rates then in force. Any upward adjustment of rates and charges for sewage services shall not be granted solely on the basis of increases of rates and charges for water services, but shall be made only after a finding by the governing body that such an adjustment is reasonable and justified; provided, that this restriction on any upward adjustment of rates and charges for water services shall not apply to counties with a metropolitan form of government. A copy of the schedule of the rates and charges so established shall be kept on file in the office of the board having charge of the operation of such works, and also in the office of the city or town clerk, and shall be open to inspection by all interested parties.

If any municipality in Tennessee adopts a sewer fee ordinance which includes a minimum base rate charge payable by all sewer users, it is declared the public policy of the state that such minimum base rate charge shall be considered to be a local tax upon sewer users in the same manner that local property taxes are so considered. However, user fees paid in excess of the minimum base rate charge that are related to the volume or strength of sewage discharged shall be considered as user fees in the same manner in which electrical, gas, or water consumption is related to actual use.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.11; Acts 1977, ch. 63, § 1; 1979, ch. 245, §§ 1, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1421.

Attorney General Opinions. Discount utility rates to charitable organizations, OAG 97-127, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 160 (9/08/97).

Payment of costs of water and sewer line relocation, OAG 97-161, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 188 (12/11/97).

Municipal authority to charge residents never connected to water system, OAG 98-0152, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 152 (8/12/98).

Requirements for utility rates, OAG 05-165 (10/25/05), 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 167.

Authority of city utility system to repair privately owned lines, OAG 06-030 (2/13/06).

Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality, OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196.

The fact that a city imposes a water and sewage rate on customers outside its corporate limits that is twice the rate charged to customers within its corporate limits does not by itself establish that the higher rate is invalid. The rate is presumptively valid, and a party seeking to challenge it bears the heavy burden of proving that the rate is not just and equitable. OAG 14-46, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 49 (4/14/14).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, § 6.

7-35-415. Charges to municipality.

The reasonable cost and value of any service rendered to a city or town by a waterworks or sewerage system shall be charged against the city or town, and shall be paid when due as the service accrues from the current funds or proceeds of taxes that the city or town is authorized and required to levy in an amount sufficient for the purpose. The funds so paid shall be deemed to be a part of the revenues of the works and shall be applied only as provided in this part for the application of such revenues.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1422.

7-35-416. Service contracts.

Any city or town operating a waterworks or sewerage system under this part is authorized and empowered to contract with one (1) or more other cities or towns or with corporations, firms, or individuals to furnish service by such works, and to collect charges for the service, and such other cities, towns, corporations, firms and individuals are authorized to enter into such contracts for such service, but only to the extent of the capacity of the works, without impairing the usefulness of the works to the owners. Cities or towns entering into contracts with owners of waterworks or sewerage systems under this part are authorized to establish, charge, and adjust by ordinance, rates and charges for the service rendered by such system or systems. Revenues derived from this source shall be used to meet the obligations of the contract. The income received by the owner of the works under any such contract shall be deemed to be a part of the revenues of the works, and shall be applied only as provided in this part for the application of such revenues.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1423.

Cross-References. Contracts between municipalities, title 7, ch. 35, part 3.

7-35-417 — 7-35-419. [Reserved.]

For the purpose of defraying the cost of acquiring a waterworks or sewerage system or any extensions to the waterworks or sewage system either by purchase or construction, or both, any municipal corporation may borrow money and issue its bonds and notes pursuant to the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.3; Acts 1969, ch. 284, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1427; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 21.

Cross-References. Limitation of actions on bonds, §28-3-113.

7-35-421 — 7-35-431. [Reserved.]

This part creates an additional and alternate method for the acquisition of waterworks or a sewerage system by any incorporated city or town and does not include, amend, alter, or repeal any other statute. A proceeding is not required for either the acquisition of a waterworks or sewerage system, or for the issuance of bonds under this part, except as provided by this part or §68-221-1017, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary.

Acts 1933, ch. 68, § 23; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.23; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1439; Acts 2020, ch. 720, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in the first sentence, substituted “This part creates” for “This part shall be deemed to create” and “and does not include” for “, and shall not be deemed to include”; in the second sentence, substituted “A proceeding is not required for either” for “No proceedings shall be required for”, deleted “under this part” following “or sewerage system”, inserted “or §68-221-1017” and substituted “any other law” for “any general or private laws of the state or the charter of any city or town”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 720, § 6. June 22, 2020.

7-35-420. Borrowing and bonds authorized.

7-35-432. Supplemental to other laws.